Utah statutes.
41-6a-503.   Penalties for driving under the influence violations.
(1)  A person who violates for the first or second time Section 41-6a-502 is
guilty of a:
(a)  class B misdemeanor; or
(b)  class A misdemeanor if the person:
(i)  has also inflicted bodily injury upon another as a proximate result of
having operated the vehicle in a negligent manner;
(ii)  had a passenger under 16 years of age in the vehicle at the time of the
offense; or
(iii)  was 21 years of age or older and had a passenger under 18 years of age
in the vehicle at the time of the offense.
(2)  A person who violates Section 41-6a-502 is guilty of a third degree
felony if:
(a)  the person has also inflicted serious bodily injury upon another as a
proximate result of having operated the vehicle in a negligent manner;
(b)  the person has two or more prior convictions as defined in Subsection
41-6a-501(2), each of which is within 10 years of:
(i)  the current conviction under Section 41-6a-502; or
(ii)  the commission of the offense upon which the current conviction is
based; or
(c)  the conviction under Section 41-6a-502 is at any time after a conviction
of:
(i)  automobile homicide under Section 76-5-207 that is committed after July
1, 2001;
(ii)  a felony violation of Section 41-6a-502 or a statute previously in
effect in this state that would constitute a violation of Section 41-6a-502
that is committed after July 1, 2001; or
(iii)  any conviction described in Subsection (2)(c)(i) or (ii) which judgment
of conviction is reduced under Section 76-3-402.
(3)  A person is guilty of a separate offense for each victim suffering bodily
injury or serious bodily injury as a result of the person's violation of
Section 41-6a-502 or death as a result of the person's violation of Section
76-5-207 whether or not the injuries arise from the same episode of driving.
